Florida, session 2026, SB1760.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 85 86 Section 1.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, 87 subsection (20) is added to section 1.01, Florida Statutes, to 88 read: 89 1.01âDefinitions.âIn construing these statutes and each and 90 every word, phrase, or part hereof, where the context will 91 permit: 92 (20)âThe term âJoint Legislative Committee on Medicaid 93 Oversightâ means a committee or committees designated by joint 94 rule of the Legislature, by the President of the Senate or the 95 Speaker of the House of Representatives, or by agreement between 96 the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 97 Representatives. 98 Section 2.âEffective upon this act becoming a law, section 99 11.405, Florida Statutes, is created to read: 100 11.405âJoint Legislative Committee on Medicaid Oversight. 101 The Joint Legislative Committee on Medicaid Oversight is created 102 to ensure that the state Medicaid program is operating in 103 accordance with the Legislatureâs intent and to promote 104 transparency and efficiency in government spending. 105 (1)âMEMBERSHIP; SUBCOMMITTEES; MEETINGS.â 106 (a)âThe committee shall be composed of five members of the 107 Senate appointed by the President of the Senate and five members 108 of the House of Representatives appointed by the Speaker of the 109 House of Representatives, with each member serving a 2-year 110 term. The chair and vice chair shall each be appointed for 1 111 year terms, with the appointments alternating between the 112 President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 113 Representatives. The chair and vice chair may not be members of 114 the same house of the Legislature. If both the chair and vice 115 chair are absent at any meeting, the members present must elect 116 a temporary chair by a majority vote. 117 (b)âMembers shall serve without compensation but may be 118 reimbursed for per diem and travel expenses pursuant to s. 119 112.061. 120 (c)âThe chair may establish subcommittees as needed to 121 fulfill the committeeâs duties. 122 (d)âThe committee shall convene at least twice a year, and 123 as often as necessary to conduct its business as required under 124 this section. Meetings may be held through teleconference or 125 other electronic means. 126 (2)âCOMMITTEE DUTIES.â 127 (a)âThe committee shall evaluate all aspects of the state 128 Medicaid program related to program financing, quality of care 129 and health outcomes, administrative functions, and operational 130 functions to ensure that the program is providing transparency 131 in the provision of health care plans and providers, ensuring 132 Medicaid recipients have access to quality health care services 133 and providing stability to the stateâs budget through a health 134 care delivery system designed to contain costs. 135 (b)âThe committee shall identify and recommend policies 136 that limit Medicaid spending growth while improving health care 137 outcomes for Medicaid recipients. In developing its 138 recommendations, the committee shall do all of the following: 139 1.âEvaluate legislation for its long-term impact on the 140 state Medicaid program. 141 2.âReview data submitted to the Agency for Health Care 142 Administration by the Medicaid managed care plans pursuant to 143 statutory and contract requirements, including, but not limited 144 to, timeliness of provider credentialing, timely payment of 145 claims, rate of claim denials, prior authorizations for 146 services, and consumer complaints. 147 3.âReview the Medicaid managed care plansâ encounter data, 148 financial data, and audits and the data used to calculate the 149 plansâ achieved savings rebates and medical loss ratios. 150 4.âReview data related to health outcomes of Medicaid 151 recipients, including, but not limited to, Healthcare 152 Effectiveness Data and Information Set measures developed by the 153 National Committee for Quality Assurance, for each Medicaid 154 managed care plan, each Medicaid managed care planâs performance 155 improvement projects, and outcome data related to all quality 156 goals included in the Medicaid managed care organization 157 contracts to improve quality for recipients. 158 5.âIdentify any areas for improvement in statute and rule 159 relating to the state Medicaid program. 160 6.âDevelop a plan of action for the future of the state 161 Medicaid program. 162 (c)âThe committee may submit periodic reports, including 163 recommendations, to the Legislature on issues related to the 164 state Medicaid program and any affiliated programs. 165 (3)âCOOPERATION.â 166 (a)âThe Auditor General and the Agency for Health Care 167 Administration shall enter into and maintain a data sharing 168 agreement by July 1, 2026, to ensure the committee has full 169 access to all data needed to fulfill its responsibilities. 170 (b)âThe Auditor General shall assist the committee in its 171 work by providing credentialed professional staff or consulting 172 services, including, but not limited to, an actuary not 173 associated with the state Medicaid program or any Medicaid 174 managed care organization who currently has a contract with the 175 state. 176 (c)âThe committee, in the course of its official duties, 177 must be given access to any relevant record, paper, or document 178 in possession of a state agency, any political subdivision of 179 the state, or any entity engaged in business or under contract 180 with a state agency, and may compel the attendance and testimony 181 of any state official or employee before the committee or secure 182 any evidence as provided in s. 11.143. The committee may also 183 have any other powers conferred on it by joint rules of the 184 Senate and the House of Representatives, and any joint rules of 185 the Senate and the House of Representatives applicable to joint 186 legislative committees apply to the proceedings of the committee 187 under this section. 188 (4)âAGENCY REPORTS.â 189 (a)âBefore implementing any change to the Medicaid managed 190 care capitation rates, the Agency for Health Care Administration 191 shall notify the committee of the change and appear before the 192 committee to provide a report detailing the managed care 193 capitation rates and administrative costs built into the 194 capitation rates. The report must include the agencyâs 195 historical and projected Medicaid program expenditure and 196 utilization trend rates by Medicaid program and service category 197 for the rate year, an explanation of how the trend rates were 198 calculated, and the policy decisions that were included in 199 setting the capitation rates. 200 (b)âIf the Agency for Health Care Administration or any 201 division within the agency is required by law to report to the 202 Legislature or to any legislative committee or subcommittee on 203 matters relating to the state Medicaid program, the agency must 204 also submit a copy of the report to the committee. 205 Section 3.âPresent subsections (2) through (5), (6) through 206 (10), and (11) through (18) of section 409.962, Florida 207 Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3) through (6), (8) 208 through (12), and (14) through (21), respectively, and new 209 subsections (2), (7), and (13) are added to that section, to 210 read: 211 409.962âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, except as 212 otherwise specifically provided, the term: 213 (2)ââAffiliate,â including the terms âaffiliated withâ and 214 âaffiliation,â means a person, as construed in s. 1.01(3), who: 215 (a)âDirectly or indirectly, through one or more 216 intermediaries, controls, is controlled by, or is under common 217 control with a specified entity or person, including parent and 218 subsidiary entities; or 219 (b)âIs deemed a ârelated partyâ according to the standards 220 adopted by the Financial Accounting Standards Board. 221 (7)ââControl,â including the terms âcontrolling,â 222 âcontrolled by,â and âunder common control with,â means the 223 possession, direct or indirect, of the power to direct or cause 224 the direction of the management and policies of a person, 225 whether through the ownership or voting securities, by contract 226 other than a commercial contract for goods or nonmanagement 227 services, or otherwise, unless the power is the result of an 228 official position with or corporate office held by the person. 229 This definition applies regardless of whether such power is 230 affirmative or negative or whether such power is actually used. 231 Control is presumed to exist, but is not limited to, when any 232 affiliate or person, as construed in s. 1.01(3): 233 (a)âDirectly or indirectly owns, controls, holds the power 234 to vote, or holds proxies representing 10 percent or more of any 235 class of the voting securities of any other person. 236 (b)âShares common ownership with any person; has an 237 investor or is a holder of an ownership interest in any person; 238 exercises control in any manner over the election of a majority 239 of the directors or of individuals exercising similar functions 240 of any person; has the power to exercise controlling influence 241 over the management of any person; or serves as a working 242 majority of the board of directors, the managers, or the 243 officers of a person, who is: 244 1.âA provider or a member of a provider group or group 245 practice as defined in s. 456.053(3) under the managed care 246 plan; or 247 2.âA person responsible for providing any pharmacy 248 services, pharmaceuticals, diagnostics, care coordination, care 249 delivery, health care services, medical equipment, 250 administrative services, or financial services under the managed 251 care plan. 252 (13)ââMarket rateâ means the price that a willing buyer 253 will pay and a willing seller will accept in an armâs-length 254 transaction which is beneficial to both parties. 255 Section 4.âSubsections (1) and (2), paragraph (h) of 256 subsection (3), and subsection (4) of section 409.967, Florida 257 Statutes, are amended, and subsection (5) is added to that 258 section, to read: 259 409.967âManaged care plan accountability.â 260 (1)âCONTRACT PROCUREMENT PROCESS.âBeginning with the 261 contract procurement process initiated during the 2023 calendar 262 year, the agency shall establish a 6-year contract with each 263 managed care plan selected through the procurement process 264 described in s. 409.966. A plan contract may not be renewed; 265 however, the agency may extend the term of a plan contract to 266 cover any delays during the transition to a new plan. The agency 267 shall extend until December 31, 2024, the term of existing plan 268 contracts awarded pursuant to the invitation to negotiate 269 published in July 2017. 270 (2)âCONTRACT REQUIREMENTS.âThe agency shall establish such 271 contract requirements as are necessary for the operation of the 272 statewide managed care program. In addition to any other 273 provisions the agency may deem necessary, the contract must 274 require: 275 (a)âPhysician compensation.âManaged care plans are expected 276 to coordinate care, manage chronic disease, and prevent the need 277 for more costly services. Effective care management should 278 enable plans to redirect available resources and increase 279 compensation for physicians. Plans achieve this performance 280 standard when physician payment rates equal or exceed Medicare 281 rates for similar services. The agency may impose fines or other 282 sanctions on a plan that fails to meet this performance standard 283 after 2 years of continuous operation. 284 (b)âEmergency services.âManaged care plans shall pay for 285 services required by ss. 395.1041 and 401.45 and rendered by a 286 noncontracted provider. The plans must comply with s. 641.3155. 287 Reimbursement for services under this paragraph is the lesser 288 of: 289 1.âThe providerâs charges; 290 2.âThe usual and customary provider charges for similar 291 services in the community where the services were provided; 292 3.âThe charge mutually agreed to by the entity and the 293 provider within 60 days after submittal of the claim; or 294 4.âThe Medicaid rate, which, for the purposes of this 295 paragraph, means the amount the provider would collect from the 296 agency on a fee-for-service basis, less any amounts for the 297 indirect costs of medical education and the direct costs of 298 graduate medical education that are otherwise included in the 299 agencyâs fee-for-service payment, as required under 42 U.S.C. s. 300 1396u-2(b)(2)(D). For the purpose of establishing the amounts 301 specified in this subparagraph, the agency shall publish on its 302 website annually, or more frequently as needed, the applicable 303 fee-for-service fee schedules and their effective dates, less 304 any amounts for indirect costs of medical education and direct 305 costs of graduate medical education that are otherwise included 306 in the agencyâs fee-for-service payments. 307 (c)âAccess.â 308 1.âThe agency shall establish specific standards for the 309 number, type, and regional distribution of providers in managed 310 care plan networks to ensure access to care for both adults and 311 children. Each plan must maintain a regionwide network of 312 providers in sufficient numbers to meet the access standards for 313 specific medical services for all recipients enrolled in the 314 plan. The exclusive use of mail-order pharmacies may not be 315 sufficient to meet network access standards. Consistent with the 316 standards established by the agency, provider networks may 317 include providers located outside the region. Each plan shall 318 establish and maintain an accurate and complete electronic 319 database of contracted providers, including information about 320 licensure or registration, locations and hours of operation, 321 specialty credentials and other certifications, specific 322 performance indicators, and such other information as the agency 323 deems necessary. The database must be available online to both 324 the agency and the public and have the capability to compare the 325 availability of providers to network adequacy standards and to 326 accept and display feedback from each providerâs patients. Each 327 plan shall submit quarterly reports to the agency identifying 328 the number of enrollees assigned to each primary care provider. 329 The agency shall conduct, or contract for, systematic and 330 continuous testing of the provider network databases maintained 331 by each plan to confirm accuracy, confirm that behavioral health 332 providers are accepting enrollees, and confirm that enrollees 333 have access to behavioral health services. 334 2.âEach managed care plan must publish any prescribed drug 335 formulary or preferred drug list on the planâs website in a 336 manner that is accessible to and searchable by enrollees and 337 providers. The plan must update the list within 24 hours after 338 making a change. Each plan must ensure that the prior 339 authorization process for prescribed drugs is readily accessible 340 to health care providers, including posting appropriate contact 341 information on its website and providing timely responses to 342 providers. For Medicaid recipients diagnosed with hemophilia who 343 have been prescribed anti-hemophilic-factor replacement 344 products, the agency shall provide for those products and 345 hemophilia overlay services through the agencyâs hemophilia 346 disease management program. 347 3.âManaged care plans, and their fiscal agents or 348 intermediaries, must accept prior authorization requests for any 349 service electronically. 350 4.âManaged care plans serving children in the care and 351 custody of the Department of Children and Families must maintain 352 complete medical, dental, and behavioral health encounter 353 information and participate in making such information available 354 to the department or the applicable contracted community-based 355 care lead agency for use in providing comprehensive and 356 coordinated case management. The agency and the department shall 357 establish an interagency agreement to provide guidance for the 358 format, confidentiality, recipient, scope, and method of 359 information to be made available and the deadlines for 360 submission of the data. The scope of information available to 361 the department shall be the data that managed care plans are 362 required to submit to the agency. The agency shall determine the 363 planâs compliance with standards for access to medical, dental, 364 and behavioral health services; the use of medications; and 365 follow-up followup on all medically necessary services 366 recommended as a result of early and periodic screening, 367 diagnosis, and treatment. 368 (d)âQuality care.âManaged care plans shall provide, or 369 contract for the provision of, care coordination to facilitate 370 the appropriate delivery of behavioral health care services in 371 the least restrictive setting with treatment and recovery 372 capabilities that address the needs of the patient. Services 373 shall be provided in a manner that integrates behavioral health 374 services and primary care. Plans shall be required to achieve 375 specific behavioral health outcome standards, established by the 376 agency in consultation with the department. 377 (e)âEncounter data.âThe agency shall maintain and operate a 378 Medicaid Encounter Data System to collect, process, store, and 379 report on covered services provided to all Medicaid recipients 380 enrolled in prepaid plans. 381 1.âEach prepaid plan must comply with the agencyâs 382 reporting requirements for the Medicaid Encounter Data System. 383 Prepaid plans must submit encounter data, including data on 384 encounters for which payment was denied and encounters for which 385 a health care provider was reimbursed by the plan on a capitated 386 basis, electronically in a format that complies with the Health 387 Insurance Portability and Accountability Act provisions for 388 electronic claims and in accordance with deadlines established 389 by the agency. Prepaid plans must certify that the data reported 390 is accurate and complete. 391 2.âThe agency is responsible for validating the data 392 submitted by the plans. The agency shall develop methods and 393 protocols for ongoing analysis of the encounter data that 394 adjusts for differences in characteristics of prepaid plan 395 enrollees to allow comparison of service utilization among plans 396 and against expected levels of use. The analysis shall be used 397 to identify possible cases of overspending on administrative 398 costs, payments by plans in excess of market rates, systemic 399 underutilization or denials of claims and inappropriate service 400 utilization such as higher-than-expected emergency department 401 encounters, and potential managed care plan fraud, waste, and 402 abuse. The analysis shall provide periodic feedback to the plans 403 and enable the agency to establish corrective action plans when 404 necessary. One of the focus areas for the analysis shall be the 405 use of prescription drugs. The analysis shall be used in managed 406 care plan capitation rate-setting processes provided under this 407 part. 408 3.âThe agency shall make encounter data available to those 409 plans accepting enrollees who are assigned to them from other 410 plans leaving a region. 411 4.âThe agency shall annually produce a report entitled 412 âAnalysis of Potentially Preventable Health Care Events of 413 Florida Medicaid Enrollees.â The report must include, but need 414 not be limited to, an analysis of the potentially preventable 415 hospital emergency department visits, hospital admissions, and 416 hospital readmissions that occurred during the previous state 417 fiscal year which may have been prevented with better access to 418 primary care, improved medication management, or better 419 coordination of care, reported by age, eligibility group, 420 managed care plan, and region, including conditions contributing 421 to each potentially preventable event or category of potentially 422 preventable events. The agency may include any other data or 423 analysis parameters to augment the report which it deems 424 pertinent to the analysis. The report must demonstrate trends 425 using applicable historical data. The agency shall submit the 426 report to the Governor, the President of the Senate, and the 427 Speaker of the House of Representatives by October 1, 2024, and 428 each October 1 thereafter. The agency may contract with a third 429 party vendor to produce the report required under this 430 subparagraph. 431 (f)âContinuous improvement.âThe agency shall establish 432 specific performance standards and expected milestones or 433 timelines for improving performance over the term of the 434 contract. 435 1.âEach managed care plan shall establish an internal 436 health care quality improvement system, including enrollee 437 satisfaction and disenrollment surveys. The quality improvement 438 system must include incentives and disincentives for network 439 providers. 440 2.âEach managed care plan must collect and report the 441 Healthcare Effectiveness Data and Information Set (HEDIS) 442 measures, the federal Core Set of Childrenâs Health Care Quality 443 measures, and the federal Core Set of Adult Health Care Quality 444 Measures, as specified by the agency. Each plan must collect and 445 report the Adult Core Set behavioral health measures beginning 446 with data reports for the 2025 calendar year. Each plan must 447 stratify reported measures by age, sex, race, ethnicity, primary 448 language, and whether the enrollee received a Social Security 449 Administration determination of disability for purposes of 450 Supplemental Security Income beginning with data reports for the 451 2026 calendar year. A planâs performance on these measures must 452 be published on the planâs website in a manner that allows 453 recipients to reliably compare the performance of plans. The 454 agency shall use the measures as a tool to monitor plan 455 performance. 456 3.âEach managed care plan must be accredited by the 457 National Committee for Quality Assurance, the Joint Commission, 458 or another nationally recognized accrediting body, or have 459 initiated the accreditation process, within 1 year after the 460 contract is executed. For any plan not accredited within 18 461 months after executing the contract, the agency shall suspend 462 automatic assignment under ss. 409.977 and 409.984. 463 (g)âProgram integrity.âEach managed care plan shall 464 establish program integrity functions and activities to reduce 465 the incidence of fraud and abuse, including, at a minimum: 466 1.âA provider credentialing system and ongoing provider 467 monitoring, including maintenance of written provider 468 credentialing policies and procedures which comply with federal 469 and agency guidelines; 470 2.âAn effective prepayment and postpayment review process 471 including, but not limited to, data analysis, system editing, 472 and auditing of network providers; 473 3.âProcedures for reporting instances of fraud and abuse 474 pursuant to chapter 641; 475 4.âAdministrative and management arrangements or 476 procedures, including a mandatory compliance plan, designed to 477 prevent fraud and abuse; and 478 5.âDesignation of a program integrity compliance officer. 479 (h)âGrievance resolution.âConsistent with federal law, each 480 managed care plan shall establish and the agency shall approve 481 an internal process for reviewing and responding to grievances 482 from enrollees. Each plan shall submit quarterly reports on the 483 number, description, and outcome of grievances filed by 484 enrollees. 485 (i)âPenalties.â 486 1.âWithdrawal and enrollment reduction.âManaged care plans 487 that reduce enrollment levels or leave a region before the end 488 of the contract term must reimburse the agency for the cost of 489 enrollment changes and other transition activities. If more than 490 one plan leaves a region at the same time, costs must be shared 491 by the departing plans proportionate to their enrollments. In 492 addition to the payment of costs, departing provider services 493 networks must pay a per-enrollee penalty of up to 3 monthsâ 494 payment and continue to provide services to the enrollee for 90 495 days or until the enrollee is enrolled in another plan, 496 whichever occurs first. In addition to payment of costs, all 497 other departing plans must pay a penalty of 25 percent of that 498 portion of the minimum surplus maintained pursuant to s. 499 641.225(1) which is attributable to the provision of coverage to 500 Medicaid enrollees. Plans shall provide at least 180 daysâ 501 notice to the agency before withdrawing from a region. If a 502 managed care plan leaves a region before the end of the contract 503 term, the agency shall terminate all contracts with that plan in 504 other regions pursuant to the termination procedures in 505 subparagraph 3. 506 2.âEncounter data.âIf a plan fails to comply with the 507 encounter data reporting requirements of this section for 30 508 days, the agency must assess a fine of $5,000 per day for each 509 day of noncompliance beginning on the 31st day. On the 31st day, 510 the agency must notify the plan that the agency will initiate 511 contract termination procedures on the 90th day unless the plan 512 comes into compliance before that date. 513 3.âTermination.âIf the agency terminates more than one 514 regional contract with the same managed care plan due to 515 noncompliance with the requirements of this section, the agency 516 shall terminate all the regional contracts held by that plan. 517 When terminating multiple contracts, the agency must develop a 518 plan to provide for the transition of enrollees to other plans, 519 and phase in the terminations over a time period sufficient to 520 ensure a smooth transition. 521 (j)âPrompt payment.âManaged care plans shall comply with 522 ss. 641.315, 641.3155, and 641.513. 523 (k)âElectronic claims.âManaged care plans, and their fiscal 524 agents or intermediaries, shall accept electronic claims in 525 compliance with federal standards. 526 (l)âFair payment.âProvider service networks must ensure 527 that no entity licensed under chapter 395 with a controlling 528 interest in the network charges a Medicaid managed care plan 529 more than the amount paid to that provider by the provider 530 service network for the same service. 531 (m)âItemized payment.âAny claims payment to a provider by a 532 managed care plan, or by a fiscal agent or intermediary of the 533 plan, must be accompanied by an itemized accounting of the 534 individual claims included in the payment including, but not 535 limited to, the enrolleeâs name, the date of service, the 536 procedure code, the amount of reimbursement, and the 537 identification of the plan on whose behalf the payment is made. 538 (n)âProvider dispute resolution.âDisputes between a plan 539 and a provider may be resolved as described in s. 408.7057. 540 (o)âTransparency.âManaged care plans shall comply with ss. 541 627.6385(3) and 641.54(7). 542 (p)âThird-party administrators.âThe agencyâ²s contract with 543 a managed care plan must require that any third-party 544 administrative entity contracted by the plan adheres to all 545 pertinent requirements of the Medicaid program placed on the 546 plan under the planâ²s contract with the agency. 547 (3)âACHIEVED SAVINGS REBATE.â 548 (h)âThe following may not be included as allowable expenses 549 in calculating income for determining the achieved savings 550 rebate: 551 1.âPayment of achieved savings rebates. 552 2.âAny financial incentive payments made to the plan 553 outside of the capitation rate. 554 3.âAny financial disincentive payments levied by the state 555 or Federal Government. 556 4.âExpenses associated with any lobbying or political 557 activities. 558 5.âThe cash value or equivalent cash value of bonuses of 559 any type paid or awarded to the planâs executive staff, other 560 than base salary. 561 6.âReserves and reserve accounts. 562 7.âAdministrative costs, including, but not limited to, 563 reinsurance expenses, interest payments, depreciation expenses, 564 bad debt expenses, and outstanding claims expenses in excess of 565 actuarially sound maximum amounts set by the agency. 566 8.âPayments to affiliates as defined in s. 409.962 in 567 excess of market rates. 568 569 The agency shall consider these and other factors in developing 570 contracts that establish shared savings arrangements. 571 (4)âMEDICAL LOSS RATIOS RATIO.â 572 (a)âIf required by federal regulations or as a condition of 573 a waiver, the agency must may calculate a medical loss ratios 574 ratio for all managed care plans contracted with the agency 575 under this part. The calculations must calculation shall use 576 uniform financial data collected from all plans and shall be 577 computed for each plan on a statewide basis. If a plan 578 participates in the managed medical assistance program, the 579 long-term care managed care program, or the pilot program for 580 individuals with developmental disabilities, the agency must 581 calculate medical loss ratios for the planâs participation in 582 each program separately and, if the plan participates in more 583 than one of these programs, for the planâs overall participation 584 in statewide Medicaid managed care. Medical loss ratios must be 585 calculated and The method for calculating the medical loss ratio 586 shall meet the following criteria: 587 (a)âExcept as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c), 588 expenditures must shall be classified in a manner consistent 589 with 42 C.F.R. part 438 45 C.F.R. part 158. 590 (b)âThe agency shall report medical loss ratios quarterly 591 and annually for each managed care plan contracted with the 592 agency under this part to the Governor, the President of the 593 Senate, and the Speaker of the House of Representatives no later 594 than 6 months after the end of each such period Funds provided 595 by plans to graduate medical education institutions to 596 underwrite the costs of residency positions shall be classified 597 as medical expenditures, provided the funding is sufficient to 598 sustain the positions for the number of years necessary to 599 complete the residency requirements and the residency positions 600 funded by the plans are active providers of care to Medicaid and 601 uninsured patients. 602 (c)âBefore final determination of the medical loss ratio 603 for any period, a plan may contribute to a designated state 604 trust fund for the purpose of supporting Medicaid and indigent 605 care and have the contribution counted as a medical expenditure 606 for the period. Funds contributed for this purpose shall be 607 deposited into the Grants and Donations Trust Fund. 608 (5)âAFFILIATED ENTITIES AND RELATED PARTIES.â 609 (a)âThe agency shall ensure oversight of affiliated 610 entities and related parties paid by managed care plans under 611 this part, including, but not limited to, examining financial 612 records and self-referral data of any managed care plan 613 providing services within the statewide managed care program 614 which uses affiliated entities and related parties. 615 (b)âThe agency shall consider data examined under paragraph 616 (a) and the findings of the annual assessment required under s. 617 409.9675(4) when developing managed care plan capitation rates 618 under this part. 619 Section 5.âEffective January 1, 2027, paragraph (f) of 620 subsection (3) of section 409.967, Florida Statutes, is amended, 621 and paragraph (g) of that subsection is republished, to read: 622 409.967âManaged care plan accountability.â 623 (3)âACHIEVED SAVINGS REBATE.â 624 (f)âAchieved savings rebates validated by the certified 625 public accountant are due within 30 days after the report is 626 submitted. Except as provided in paragraph (h), the achieved 627 savings rebate is established by determining pretax income as a 628 percentage of revenues and applying the following income sharing 629 ratios: 630 1.âOne hundred percent of income up to and including 3 5 631 percent of revenue shall be retained by the plan. 632 2.âThirty Fifty percent of income above 3 5 percent and up 633 to 10 percent shall be retained by the plan, and the other 70 50 634 percent shall be refunded to the state and adjusted for the 635 Federal Medical Assistance Percentages. The state share shall be 636 transferred to the General Revenue Fund, unallocated, and the 637 federal share shall be transferred to the Medical Care Trust 638 Fund, unallocated. 639 3.âOne hundred percent of income above 10 percent of 640 revenue shall be refunded to the state and adjusted for the 641 Federal Medical Assistance Percentages. The state share shall be 642 transferred to the General Revenue Fund, unallocated, and the 643 federal share shall be transferred to the Medical Care Trust 644 Fund, unallocated. 645 (g)âA plan that exceeds agency-defined quality measures in 646 the reporting period may retain an additional 1 percent of 647 revenue. For the purpose of this paragraph, the quality measures 648 must include plan performance for preventing or managing 649 complex, chronic conditions that are associated with an elevated 650 likelihood of requiring high-cost medical treatments. 651 Section 6.âSection 409.9675, Florida Statutes, is created 652 to read: 653 409.9675âAffiliated entities and controlling interests; 654 reports required.â 655 (1)âEach managed care plan contracted by the agency under 656 this part shall report all of the following by March 31, 2027, 657 for the prior calendar year, and annually thereafter, to the 658 agency and the Office of Insurance Regulation in a manner 659 prescribed by the agency: 660 (a)âAny person controlled by or affiliated with the managed 661 care plan, including, but not limited to, any provider, provider 662 group, group practice defined in s. 456.053(3), or person 663 responsible for providing any pharmacy services, 664 pharmaceuticals, diagnostics, care coordination, care delivery, 665 health care services, medical equipment, administrative 666 services, or financial services for, to, or on behalf of the 667 managed care plan. 668 (b)âAny affiliation of any kind or nature with any person 669 which has, either directly or indirectly through one or more 670 intermediaries, an investment or ownership interest representing 671 10 percent or more, shares common ownership with, or has an 672 investor or a holder of an ownership interest representing 10 673 percent or more with any person providing pharmacy services, 674 diagnostics, care coordination, care delivery, health care 675 services, medical equipment, administrative services, or 676 financial services for, to, or on behalf of the managed care 677 plan. 678 (2)âFor any affiliation reported by a managed care plan 679 under subsection (1), the report must include all of the 680 following: 681 (a)âThe percentage of ownership or control of any person or 682 affiliate with whom the managed care plan has had business 683 transactions totaling in the aggregate more than $25,000 during 684 the prior 12-month period in the annual achieved savings rebate 685 financial reporting required under s. 409.967(3) and 686 identification of the specific contract or contracts involved in 687 such business transactions. 688 (b)âAny significant business transactions between the 689 managed care plan and any affiliated person during the 12-month 690 period in the annual achieved savings rebate financial reporting 691 required under s. 409.967(3). 692 (3)âEach managed care plan shall report any change in 693 information required by subsection (1) to the agency and the 694 Office of Insurance Regulation in writing within 60 days after 695 the change occurs. 696 (4)âBy December 31, 2026, and annually thereafter, the 697 agency shall calculate, analyze, and publicly report on the 698 agencyâs website an assessment of affiliated entity payment 699 transactions in the Medicaid program for medical benefit and 700 administrative costs as reported for purposes of the achieved 701 savings rebate. The baseline assessment, at a minimum, must 702 include achieved savings rebate transactions for the years 2021, 703 2022, and 2023; the amount and associated percentage of 704 affiliated entity payments within the medical loss ratio; and 705 the payment deviation percentages and associated amounts at the 706 Healthcare Common Procedure Coding System level for affiliated 707 entities as compared to nonaffiliated entities. The assessment 708 must also compare payment amounts for value-based or alternative 709 payment arrangements. 710 Section 7.âPresent paragraphs (b), (c), and (d), and (e) 711 through (x) of subsection (1) of section 626.8825, Florida 712 Statutes, are redesignated as paragraphs (c), (d), and (e), and 713 (g) through (z), respectively, new paragraphs (b) and (f) are 714 added to that subsection, and present paragraph (u) of 715 subsection (1), paragraphs (e) and (g) of subsection (2), and 716 paragraphs (c) and (h) of subsection (3) of that section are 717 amended, to read: 718 626.8825âPharmacy benefit manager transparency and 719 accountability.â 720 (1)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section, the term: 721 (b)ââAffiliated manufacturerâ means a prescription drug 722 manufacturer permitted under chapter 499 or a private label 723 distributor as defined in 21 C.F.R. s. 207.1 which directly or 724 indirectly through one or more intermediaries: 725 1.âHas an investment or ownership interest in a pharmacy 726 benefit manager holding a certificate of authority issued under 727 this part; 728 2.âShares common ownership with a pharmacy benefit manager 729 holding a certificate of authority issued under this part; or 730 3.âHas an investor or a holder of an ownership interest 731 which is a pharmacy benefit manager holding a certificate of 732 authority issued under this part. 733 (f)ââCovered prescription drugâ means any drug or biologic 734 included in a pharmacy benefit managerâs formulary which is paid 735 for as a pharmacy benefit under the plan at any of the planâs 736 network pharmacies. 737 (w)(u)ââPharmacy benefits plan or programâ means a plan or 738 program that pays for, reimburses, covers the cost of, or 739 provides access to discounts on pharmacist services provided by 740 one or more pharmacies to covered persons who reside in, are 741 employed by, or receive pharmacist services from this state. 742 1.âThe term includes, but is not limited to, health 743 maintenance organizations, health insurers, self-insured 744 employer health plans, discount card programs, and government 745 funded health plans, including the Statewide Medicaid Managed 746 Care program established pursuant to part IV of chapter 409 and 747 the state group insurance program pursuant to part I of chapter 748 110. 749 2.âThe term excludes such a plan or program under s. 430.84 750 or chapter 440. 751 (2)âCONTRACTS BETWEEN A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER AND A 752 PHARMACY BENEFITS PLAN OR PROGRAM.âIn addition to any other 753 requirements in the Florida Insurance Code, all contractual 754 arrangements executed, amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after 755 July 1, 2023, which are applicable to pharmacy benefits covered 756 on or after January 1, 2024, between a pharmacy benefit manager 757 and a pharmacy benefits plan or program must include, in 758 substantial form, terms that ensure compliance with all of the 759 following requirements and that, except to the extent not 760 allowed by law, shall supersede any contractual terms to the 761 contrary: 762 (e)âInclude network adequacy requirements that meet or 763 exceed Medicare Part D program standards for convenient access 764 to the network pharmacies set forth in 42 C.F.R. s. 765 423.120(a)(1) and that: 766 1.âDo not limit a network to solely include affiliated 767 pharmacies; 768 2.âRequire a pharmacy benefit manager to offer a provider 769 contract to licensed pharmacies physically located on the 770 physical site of providers that are: 771 a.âWithin the pharmacy benefits planâs or programâs 772 geographic service area and that have been specifically 773 designated as essential providers by the Agency for Health Care 774 Administration pursuant to s. 409.975(1)(a); 775 b.âDesignated as cancer centers of excellence under s. 776 381.925, regardless of the pharmacy benefits planâs or programâs 777 geographic service area; 778 c.âOrgan transplant hospitals, regardless of the pharmacy 779 benefits planâs or programâs geographic service area; 780 d.âHospitals licensed as specialty childrenâs hospitals as 781 defined in s. 395.002; or 782 e.âRegional perinatal intensive care centers as defined in 783 s. 383.16(2), regardless of the pharmacy benefits planâs or 784 programâs geographic service area. 785 786 Such provider contracts must be solely for the administration 787 and or dispensing of covered prescription drugs, including 788 biological products, which are administered through infusions, 789 intravenously injected, or inhaled during a surgical procedure 790 or are covered parenteral drugs, as part of onsite outpatient 791 care; 792 3.âDo not require a covered person to receive a 793 prescription drug by United States mail, common carrier, local 794 courier, third-party company or delivery service, or pharmacy 795 direct delivery unless the prescription drug cannot be acquired 796 at any retail pharmacy in the pharmacy benefit managerâs network 797 for the covered personâs pharmacy benefits plan or program. This 798 subparagraph does not prohibit a pharmacy benefit manager from 799 operating mail order or delivery programs on an opt-in basis at 800 the sole discretion of a covered person, provided that the 801 covered person is not penalized through the imposition of any 802 additional retail cost-sharing obligations or a lower allowed 803 quantity limit for choosing not to select the mail order or 804 delivery programs; 805 4.âFor the in-person administration of covered prescription 806 drugs, prohibit requiring a covered person to receive pharmacist 807 services from an affiliated pharmacy or an affiliated health 808 care provider; and 809 5.âProhibit offering or implementing pharmacy networks that 810 require or provide a promotional item or an incentive, defined 811 as anything other than a reduced cost-sharing amount or enhanced 812 quantity limit allowed under the benefit design for a covered 813 drug, to a covered person to use an affiliated pharmacy or an 814 affiliated health care provider for the in-person administration 815 of covered prescription drugs; or advertising, marketing, or 816 promoting an affiliated pharmacy to covered persons. Subject to 817 the foregoing, a pharmacy benefit manager may include an 818 affiliated pharmacy in communications to covered persons 819 regarding network pharmacies and prices, provided that the 820 pharmacy benefit manager includes information, such as links to 821 all nonaffiliated network pharmacies, in such communications and 822 that the information provided is accurate and of equal 823 prominence. This subparagraph may not be construed to prohibit a 824 pharmacy benefit manager from entering into an agreement with an 825 affiliated pharmacy to provide pharmacist services to covered 826 persons. 827 (g)âProhibit a pharmacy benefit manager from instituting a 828 network that requires a pharmacy to meet accreditation standards 829 inconsistent with or more stringent than applicable federal and 830 state requirements for licensure and operation as a pharmacy in 831 this state. However, a pharmacy benefit manager may specify 832 additional specialty networks that require enhanced standards 833 related to the safety and competency necessary to meet the 834 United States Food and Drug Administrationâs limited 835 distribution requirements for dispensing any drug that, on a 836 drug-by-drug basis, requires extraordinary special handling, 837 provider coordination, or clinical care or monitoring when such 838 extraordinary requirements cannot be met by a retail pharmacy. 839 For purposes of this paragraph, drugs requiring extraordinary 840 special handling are limited to drugs that are subject to a risk 841 evaluation and mitigation strategy approved by the United States 842 Food and Drug Administration and that: 843 1.âRequire special certification of a health care provider 844 to prescribe, receive, dispense, or administer; or 845 2.âRequire special handling due to the molecular complexity 846 or cytotoxic properties of the biologic or biosimilar product or 847 drug. 848 849 For participation in a specialty network, a pharmacy benefit 850 manager may not require a pharmacy to meet requirements for 851 participation beyond those necessary to demonstrate the 852 pharmacyâs ability to dispense the drug in accordance with the 853 United States Food and Drug Administrationâs approved 854 manufacturer labeling. 855 (3)âCONTRACTS BETWEEN A PHARMACY BENEFIT MANAGER AND A 856 PARTICIPATING PHARMACY.âIn addition to other requirements in the 857 Florida Insurance Code, a participation contract executed, 858 amended, adjusted, or renewed on or after July 1, 2023, that 859 applies to pharmacist services on or after January 1, 2024, 860 between a pharmacy benefit manager and one or more pharmacies or 861 pharmacists, must include, in substantial form, terms that 862 ensure compliance with all of the following requirements, and 863 that, except to the extent not allowed by law, shall supersede 864 any contractual terms in the participation contract to the 865 contrary: 866 (c)âA prohibition of financial clawbacks, reconciliation 867 offsets, or offsets to adjudicated claims. A pharmacy benefit 868 manager may not charge, withhold, offset, or recoup any direct 869 or indirect remuneration fees, dispensing fees, brand name or 870 generic effective rate adjustments through reconciliation, or 871 any other monetary charge, withholding, or recoupments as 872 related to discounts, multiple network reconciliation offsets, 873 adjudication transaction fees, and any other instance when an 874 amount a fee may be recouped from a pharmacy if such action 875 would result in a reduction in the amount paid to the pharmacy 876 or pharmacist. This prohibition does not apply to: 877 1.âAny incentive payments provided by the pharmacy benefit 878 manager to a network pharmacy for meeting or exceeding 879 predefined quality measures, such as Healthcare Effectiveness 880 Data and Information Set measures; recoupment due to an 881 erroneous claim, fraud, waste, or abuse; a claim adjudicated in 882 error; a maximum allowable cost appeal pricing adjustment; or an 883 adjustment made as part of a pharmacy audit pursuant to s. 884 624.491. 885 2.âAny recoupment that is returned to the state for 886 programs in chapter 409 or the state group insurance program in 887 s. 110.123. 888 (h)âThe pharmacy benefit manager shall provide a reasonable 889 administrative appeal procedure to allow a pharmacy or 890 pharmacist to challenge the maximum allowable cost pricing 891 information and the reimbursement made under the maximum 892 allowable cost as defined in s. 627.64741 for a specific drug as 893 being below the acquisition cost available to the challenging 894 pharmacy or pharmacist. 895 1.âThe administrative appeal procedure must include a 896 telephone number and e-mail address, or a website, for the 897 purpose of submitting the administrative appeal. The appeal may 898 be submitted by the pharmacy or an agent of the pharmacy 899 directly to the pharmacy benefit manager or through a pharmacy 900 service administration organization. The administrative appeal 901 process must allow a pharmacy or pharmacist the option to submit 902 an electronic spreadsheet or similar electronic document 903 containing a consolidated administrative appeal representing 904 multiple adjudicated claims that share the same drug and day 905 supply and have a date of service occurring within the same 906 calendar month. The pharmacy or pharmacist must be given at 907 least 30 business days after a maximum allowable cost update or 908 after an adjudication for an electronic claim or reimbursement 909 for a nonelectronic claim to file the administrative appeal. 910 2.âThe pharmacy benefit manager must respond to the 911 administrative appeal within 30 business days after receipt of 912 the appeal. 913 3.âIf the appeal is upheld, the pharmacy benefit manager 914 must: 915 a.âUpdate the maximum allowable cost pricing information to 916 at least the acquisition cost available to the pharmacy; 917 b.âPermit the pharmacy or pharmacist to reverse and rebill 918 the claim in question; 919 c.âProvide to the pharmacy or pharmacist the national drug 920 code on which the increase or change is based; and 921 d.âMake the increase or change effective for each similarly 922 situated pharmacy or pharmacist who is subject to the applicable 923 maximum allowable cost pricing information. 924 4.âIf the appeal is denied, the pharmacy benefit manager 925 must provide to the pharmacy or pharmacist the national drug 926 code and the name of the national or regional pharmaceutical 927 wholesalers operating in this state which have the drug 928 currently in stock at a price below the maximum allowable cost 929 pricing information. 930 5.âBeginning August 15, 2026 Every 90 days, a pharmacy 931 benefit manager shall report to the office the total number of 932 appeals received and denied in the preceding quarter 90-day 933 period, with an explanation or reason for each denial, for each 934 specific drug for which an appeal was submitted pursuant to this 935 paragraph. The deadlines for each filing are March 1 for the 936 preceding yearâ²s fourth quarter; May 15 for each yearâ²s first 937 quarter; August 15 for each yearâ²s second quarter; and November 938 15 for each yearâ²s third quarter. 939 Section 8.âSubsection (7) of section 626.8827, Florida 940 Statutes, is amended, and subsections (8), (9), and (10) are 941 added to that section, to read: 942 626.8827âPharmacy benefit manager prohibited practices.âIn 943 addition to other prohibitions in this part, a pharmacy benefit 944 manager may not do any of the following: 945 (7)âFail to comply with the requirements in s. 624.491 or 946 s. 626.8825, or breach contractual terms required under s. 947 626.8825. 948 (8)âProhibit or restrict a pharmacy from declining to 949 dispense a drug if the reimbursement rate for the drug is less 950 than the actual acquisition cost to the pharmacy. 951 (9)âReimburse a pharmacy less than it reimburses an 952 affiliate pharmacy. 953 (10)âMaintain an ownership interest, investment interest, 954 or common ownership with an affiliated manufacturer, or share 955 any investor or holder of an ownership interest with an 956 affiliated manufacturer. 957 Section 9.âSubsection (1) of section 627.42392, Florida 958 Statutes, is amended to read: 959 627.42392âPrior authorization.â 960 (1)âAs used in this section, the term âhealth insurerâ 961 means an authorized insurer offering health insurance as defined 962 in s. 624.603, a managed care plan as defined in s. 409.962 s. 963 409.962(10), or a health maintenance organization as defined in 964 s. 641.19(12). 965 Section 10.âExcept as otherwise provided in this act and 966 except for this section, which shall take effect upon this act 967 becoming a law, this act shall take effect July 1, 2026.